Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-618
Attempted suicide; how construed.

For purposes of making health care decisions, an attempted suicide by an individual shall not be construed as any indication of his or her wishes with regard to health care.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 18.